Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.230

Teachers' insurance benefits—Reimbursement.

The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate shall prepare vouchers for the state treasurer for sums covering amounts due a school district for any teacher who is on a leave of absence as a legislator, and who has chosen to continue insurance benefits provided by the school district, in lieu of insurance benefits provided to that legislator as a state employee. The amount of reimbursement due the school district is for the actual cost of continuing benefits, but may not exceed the cost of the insurance benefits package that would otherwise be provided through the health care authority.

[ 1998 c 62 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 62: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 20, 1998]." [ 1998 c 62 s 4.]